02_Morphology/tr.lexc
Multichar_Symbols

    %{A%}       ! Vowel Harmony
    %{E%}       ! Vowel Harmony
    %{U%}       ! Vowel Harmony
    %{Y%}       ! Vowel Ending
    %{I%}       ! Possessive Vowel Ending
    %{P%}       ! Possessive
    %<n%>       ! Noun
    %<pl%>      ! Plural
    %<pos%>     ! Possessive
    %<plurpos%> ! Possessive
    %<ins%>     ! Instrumental
    %>          ! Morpheme Boundary

LEXICON Root

Nouns ;

LEXICON PLURAL

                     POSSESSIVE ;
    %<pl%>:%>l%{A%}r POSSESSIVE ;

LEXICON N
    
    %<n%>: PLURAL ;

LEXICON POSSESSIVE
    
                         # ; !CASES ;
    %<pos%>:%>%{U%}%{P%} # ; !PLURPOSSESSIVE ;

LEXICON PLURPOSSESSIVE
    
                        CASES ;
    %<plurpos%>:%>%{I%}z CASES ;

LEXICON CASES
                        
                          # ;
    %<ins%>:%>%{Y%}l%{E%} # ;

LEXICON Nouns

    sokak:sokak N ;      ! "street"
    bligi:bilgi N ;      ! "knowledge"
    araba:araba N ;      ! "car"
    telefon:telefon N;   ! "phone
    içecek:içecek N;     ! "drink"
